Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202532-405
Special election; when held.

(1) Except as otherwise specifically provided:

(a) Any special election under the Election Act shall be held on the first Tuesday following the second Monday of the selected month, except that if such day falls upon a legal holiday, the election shall be held on the first Tuesday following the first Monday of the selected month;

(b) No special election shall be held under the Election Act in March, April, May, June, October, November, or December of an even-numbered year unless it is held in conjunction with the statewide primary or general election; and

(c) No special election shall be held under the Election Act in August or September of an even-numbered year except as provided in section 32-564 and except for a special election by a political subdivision pursuant to section 13-519 to exceed an applicable allowable growth percentage or section 77-3444 to exceed a property tax levy limit in section 77-3442.

(2) A special election for a Class I, II, III, IV, or V school district which is located in whole or in part in a county in which a city of the primary or metropolitan class is located may be held in conjunction with the primary or general election for a city of the primary or metropolitan class which is governed by a home rule charter.

Laws 2003, LB 521, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB1055, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 19;

Laws 2024, LB1329, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 33.